Hawaii statutes.
§437B-7 License required. On or
after January 1, 1976, it shall be unlawful for any person to engage in the
repair of motor vehicles for compensation without being licensed as a motor
vehicle repair dealer or motor vehicle mechanic in accordance with this
chapter. Every motor vehicle repair dealer shall be a motor vehicle mechanic
or shall have at least one motor vehicle mechanic in the dealer's employ. No
motor vehicle mechanic shall engage in the repair of motor vehicles unless that
person is also licensed as a motor vehicle repair dealer or unless that person
is in the employ of a motor vehicle repair dealer. [L 1975, c 143, pt of §2; am
L 1985, c 65, §1; am L 1998, c 199, §4]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next